Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-1037
Retirement committee; duties.

(1) It shall be the duty of the retirement committee to:

(a) Elect a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and such other officers as the committee deems appropriate;

(b) Hold regular quarterly meetings and special meetings upon the call of the chairperson;

(c) Conduct meetings pursuant to the Open Meetings Act;

(d) Provide each employee a summary of plan eligibility requirements, benefit provisions, and investment options available to such employee;

(e) Provide, within thirty days after a request is made by a participant, a statement describing the amount of benefits such participant is eligible to receive; and

(f) Make available for review an annual report of the system's operations describing both (i) the amount of contributions to the system from both employee and employer sources and (ii) an identification of the total assets of the retirement system.

(2)(a) For any defined benefit plan, by December 31 each year the chairperson of the retirement committee or his or her designee shall prepare and electronically file an annual report with the Auditor of Public Accounts and the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee of the Legislature. If such retirement plan is a defined benefit plan which was open to new members on January 1, 2004, the report shall be in addition to the reports required by section 13-2402. The report shall be on a form prescribed by the Auditor of Public Accounts and shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(i) The levels of benefits of participants in the plan, the number of members who are eligible for a benefit, the total present value of such members' benefits, and the funding sources which will pay for such benefits; and

(ii) A copy of a full actuarial analysis of each such defined benefit plan. The analysis shall be prepared by an independent private organization or public entity employing actuaries who are members in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries, and which organization or entity has demonstrated expertise to perform this type of analysis and is unrelated to any organization which offers investment advice or provides investment management services to the retirement plan.

(b) The Auditor of Public Accounts may prepare a review of such report pursuant to section 84-304.02 but is not required to do so. If the retirement committee does not submit a copy of the report to the Auditor of Public Accounts within six months after the end of the plan year, the Auditor of Public Accounts may audit, or cause to be audited, the retirement committee. All costs of the audit shall be paid by the retirement committee.

Laws 1983, LB 531, § 18;

Laws 1992, LB 672, § 28;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 20;

Laws 1999, LB 795, § 8;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB474, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB759, § 13;

Laws 2017, LB415, § 8;

Laws 2024, LB686, § 10.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.